Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Powers
§ 202f. Section 202f effective until January 1, 2022; see also section 202f effective January 1, 2022 set out below. Telecommunications and Connectivity Advisory Board.

There is created the Telecommunications and Connectivity Advisory Board for the purpose of making recommendations to the Commissioner of Public Service regarding his or her telecommunications responsibilities and duties as provided in this section. The Connectivity Advisory Board shall consist of eight members selected as follows:

the State Treasurer or designee;

the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development or designee;

five at-large members appointed by the Governor, who shall not be employees or officers of the State at the time of appointment; and

the Secretary of Transportation or designee.

A quorum of the Connectivity Advisory Board shall consist of four voting members. No action of the Board shall be considered valid unless the action is supported by a majority vote of the members present and voting and then only if at least four members vote in favor of the action. The Governor shall select, from among the at-large members, a chair and vice chair.

In making appointments of at-large members, the Governor shall give consideration to citizens of the State with knowledge of telecommunications technology, telecommunications regulatory law, transportation rights-of-way and infrastructure, finance, environmental permitting, and expertise regarding the delivery of telecommunications services in rural, high-cost areas. However, the five at-large members may not be persons with a financial interest in or owners or employees of an enterprise that provides broadband or cellular service or that is seeking in-kind or financial support from the Department of Public Service. The conflict of interest provision in this subsection shall not be construed to disqualify a member who has ownership in a mutual fund, exchange traded fund, pension plan, or similar entity that owns shares in such enterprises as part of a broadly diversified portfolio. The at-large members shall serve terms of two years beginning on February 1 in odd-numbered years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. However, three of the five at-large members first appointed by the Governor shall serve an initial term of three years. Vacancies shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term. A member may be reappointed for up to three consecutive terms. Upon completion of a term of service for any reason, including the term’s expiration or a member’s resignation, and for one year from the date of such completion, a former Board member shall not advocate before the Connectivity Board, Department of Public Service, or the Public Utility Commission on behalf of an enterprise that provides broadband or cellular service.

Except for those members otherwise regularly employed by the State, the compensation of the Board’s members is that provided by

32 V.S.A. § 1010(a)

. All members of the Board, including those members otherwise regularly employed by the State, shall receive their actual and necessary expenses when away from home or office upon their official duties.

In performing its duties, the Connectivity Advisory Board may use the legal and technical resources of the Department of Public Service. The Department of Public Service shall provide the Board with administrative services.

The Connectivity Advisory Board shall:

have review and nonbinding approval authority with respect to the awarding of grants under the Connectivity Initiative. The Commissioner shall have sole authority to make the final decision on grant awards, as provided in subsection (g) of this section.

function in an advisory capacity to the Commissioner on the development of State telecommunications policy and planning, including the action plan required under subdivision 202e(b)(6) of this chapter and the State Telecommunications Plan.

annually advise the Commissioner on the development of requests for proposals under the Connectivity Initiative.

annually provide the Commissioner with recommendations for the apportionment of funds to the High-Cost Program and the Connectivity Initiative.

annually provide the Commissioner with recommendations on the appropriate Internet access speeds for publicly funded telecommunications and connectivity projects.

The Commissioner shall make an initial determination as to whether a proposal submitted under the Connectivity Initiative meets the criteria of the request for proposals. The Commissioner shall then provide the Connectivity Advisory Board a list of all eligible proposals and recommendations. The Connectivity Advisory Board shall review the recommendations of the Commissioner and may review any proposal submitted, as it deems necessary, and either approve or disapprove each recommendation and may make new recommendations for the Commissioner’s final consideration. The Commissioner shall have final decision-making authority with respect to the awarding of grants under the Connectivity Initiative. If the Commissioner does not accept a recommendation of the Board, he or she shall provide the Board with a written explanation for such decision.

On November 15, 2019, and annually thereafter, the Commissioner shall submit to the Connectivity Advisory Board an accounting of monies in the Connectivity Fund and anticipated revenue for the next year.

The Chair shall call the first meeting of the Connectivity Advisory Board. The Chair or a majority of Board members may call a Board meeting. The Board may meet up to six times a year.

At least annually, the Connectivity Advisory Board and the Commissioner or designee shall jointly hold a public meeting to review and discuss the status of State telecommunications policy and planning, the Telecommunications Plan, the Connectivity Fund, the Connectivity Initiative, the High-Cost Program, and any other matters they deem necessary to fulfill their obligations under this section.

Information and materials submitted by a telecommunications service provider concerning confidential financial or proprietary information shall be exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act, nor shall any information that would identify a provider who has submitted a proposal under the Connectivity Initiative be disclosed without the consent of the provider, unless a grant award has been made to that provider. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the publication of statistical information, determinations, reports, opinions, or other information so long as the data are disclosed in a form that cannot identify or be associated with a particular telecommunications service provider.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 41

, § 5; amended

2019, No. 31

, § 7;

2021, No. 71

, § 8, eff. Jan. 1, 2022.

§ 202f. Section 202f effective January 1, 2022; see also section 202f effective until January 1, 2022 set out above. Telecommunications and Connectivity Advisory Board.

There is created the Telecommunications and Connectivity Advisory Board for the purpose of making recommendations to the Commissioner of Public Service regarding his or her telecommunications responsibilities and duties as provided in this section. The Connectivity Advisory Board shall consist of eight members selected as follows:

the State Treasurer or designee;

the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development or designee;

five at-large members appointed by the Governor, who shall not be employees or officers of the State at the time of appointment; and

the Secretary of Transportation or designee.

A quorum of the Connectivity Advisory Board shall consist of four voting members. No action of the Board shall be considered valid unless the action is supported by a majority vote of the members present and voting and then only if at least four members vote in favor of the action. The Governor shall select, from among the at-large members, a chair and vice chair.

In making appointments of at-large members, the Governor shall give consideration to citizens of the State with knowledge of telecommunications technology, telecommunications regulatory law, transportation rights-of-way and infrastructure, finance, environmental permitting, and expertise regarding the delivery of telecommunications services in rural, high-cost areas. However, the five at-large members may not be persons with a financial interest in or owners or employees of an enterprise that provides broadband or cellular service or that is seeking in-kind or financial support from the Department of Public Service. The conflict of interest provision in this subsection shall not be construed to disqualify a member who has ownership in a mutual fund, exchange traded fund, pension plan, or similar entity that owns shares in such enterprises as part of a broadly diversified portfolio. The at-large members shall serve terms of two years beginning on February 1 in odd-numbered years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. However, three of the five at-large members first appointed by the Governor shall serve an initial term of three years. Vacancies shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term. A member may be reappointed for up to three consecutive terms. Upon completion of a term of service for any reason, including the term’s expiration or a member’s resignation, and for one year from the date of such completion, a former Board member shall not advocate before the Connectivity Board, Department of Public Service, or the Public Utility Commission on behalf of an enterprise that provides broadband or cellular service.

Except for those members otherwise regularly employed by the State, the compensation of the Board’s members is that provided by

32 V.S.A. § 1010(a)

. All members of the Board, including those members otherwise regularly employed by the State, shall receive their actual and necessary expenses when away from home or office upon their official duties.

In performing its duties, the Connectivity Advisory Board may use the legal and technical resources of the Department of Public Service. The Department of Public Service shall provide the Board with administrative services.

The Connectivity Advisory Board shall:

function in an advisory capacity to the Commissioner on the development of State telecommunications policy and planning, including the action plan required under subdivision 202e(b)(6) of this chapter and the State Telecommunications Plan; and

annually provide the Commissioner with recommendations on the appropriate Internet access speeds for publicly funded telecommunications and connectivity broadband projects.

On November 15, 2019, and annually thereafter, the Commissioner shall submit to the Connectivity Advisory Board an accounting of monies in the Connectivity Fund and anticipated revenue for the next year.

The Chair shall call the first meeting of the Connectivity Advisory Board. The Chair or a majority of Board members may call a Board meeting. The Board may meet up to six times a year.

At least annually, the Connectivity Advisory Board and the Commissioner or designee shall jointly hold a public meeting to review and discuss the status of State telecommunications policy and planning, the Telecommunications Plan, the Connectivity Fund, the Connectivity Initiative, the High-Cost Program, and any other matters they deem necessary to fulfill their obligations under this section.

Information and materials submitted by a telecommunications service provider concerning confidential financial or proprietary information shall be exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act, nor shall any information that would identify a provider who has submitted a proposal under the Connectivity Initiative be disclosed without the consent of the provider, unless a grant award has been made to that provider. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the publication of statistical information, determinations, reports, opinions, or other information, provided the data are disclosed in a form that cannot identify or be associated with a particular telecommunications service provider.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 41

, § 5; amended

2019, No. 31

, § 7;

2021, No. 71

, § 8, eff. Jan. 1, 2022.

§ 203.
Jurisdiction of certain public utilities.

The Public Utility Commission and the Department of Public Service shall have jurisdiction over the following described companies within the State, their directors, receivers, trustees, lessees, or other persons or companies owning or operating such companies and of all plants, lines, exchanges, and equipment of such companies used in or about the business carried on by them in this State as covered and included herein. Such jurisdiction shall be exercised by the Commission and the Department so far as may be necessary to enable them to perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred upon them by law. The Commission and the Department may, when they deem the public good requires, examine the plants, equipment, lines, exchanges, stations, and property of the companies subject to their jurisdiction under this chapter.

A company engaged in the manufacture, transmission, distribution, storage, or sale of gas or electricity directly to the public or to be used ultimately by the public for lighting, heating, or power and so far as relates to their use or occupancy of the public highways.

That part of the business of a company that consists of the manufacture, transmission, distribution, storage, or sale of gas or electricity directly to the public or to be used ultimately by the public for lighting, heating, or power and so far as relates to their use or occupancy of the public highways.

A company other than a municipality or a water system exempted under the provisions of

10 V.S.A. § 1675a

engaged in the collecting, sale, and distribution of water for domestic, industrial, business, or fire protection purposes.

A company engaged in the construction and maintenance of dams and storage reservoirs whether for the purpose of prevention of damage by flood, or for the purpose of power to be developed, or for the benefit of waterpower, developed or undeveloped, so situated as to be affected by such reservoirs and dams.

A person or company offering telecommunications service to the public on a common carrier basis. “Telecommunications service” means the transmission of any interactive two-way electromagnetic communications, including voice, image, data, and information. Transmission of electromagnetic communications includes the use of any media such as wires, cables, television cables, microwaves, radio waves, light waves, or any combination of those or similar media. Telecommunications service does not include value-added nonvoice services in which computer processing applications are used to act on the form, content, code, and protocol of the information to be transmitted unless those services are provided under tariff approved by the Public Utility Commission.

A company or that part of a company, other than a municipality, which has obtained a direct or indirect discharge permit issued by the Agency of Natural Resources and is engaged in the collection or disposal of wastewater or domestic sewage or any combination of these activities, except companies solely involved in the hauling of septage or sludge. This subdivision shall only apply to companies which, together with any affiliates, service 750 or more household or dwelling units.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section, the Commission and Department shall not have jurisdiction over persons otherwise not regulated by the Commission that are engaged in the siting, construction, ownership, operation, or control of a facility that sells or supplies electricity to the public exclusively for charging a plug-in electric vehicle, as defined in

23 V.S.A. § 4(85)

. These persons may charge by the kWh for owned or operated electric vehicle supply equipment, as defined in section 201 of this title, but shall not be treated as an electric distribution utility just because electric vehicle supply equipment charges by the kWh.

For purposes of this section, “storage” has the same meaning as “energy storage facility” as defined in section 201 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 267

, § 1, eff. Aug. 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1985, No. 224

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1987, No. 87

, § 5;

1993, No. 21

, § 19, eff. May 12, 1993;

1993, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 59

, § 39, eff. June 14, 2019;

2021, No. 54

, § 6.

§ 203a.
Fuel Efficiency Fund.

Fuel Efficiency Fund. There is established the Fuel Efficiency Fund to be administered by a fund administrator appointed by the Commission. Balances in the Fund shall be ratepayer funds, shall be used to support the activities authorized in this subsection, and shall be carried forward and remain in the Fund at the end of each fiscal year. These monies shall not be available to meet the general obligations of the State. Interest earned shall remain in the Fund. The Fund shall contain such sums as appropriated by the General Assembly or as otherwise provided by law, in addition to revenues from the sale of credits under the RGGI cap and trade program as provided for under section 255 of this title.

Use of the Fund. The Fuel Efficiency Fund shall be used to support the delivery of energy efficiency services to Vermont heating and process fuel consumers and to carry out cost-effective efficiency measures and reductions in greenhouse gas emissions from those sectors. These energy efficiency services shall be delivered by the service provider or providers selected by the Department of Public Service under section 235 of this title to perform these functions.

[Repealed.]

Department costs. Up to five percent of amounts allocated to the Department of Public Service from the Fund may be used for administrative costs directly related to the Fuel Efficiency Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 11; amended

2009, No. 54

, § 103, eff. June 1, 2009;

2009, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § E.235, eff. June 2, 2009;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 48;

2019, No. 31

, § 1.

§ 204.
Organization; reports of public utility corporations.

Immediately upon the transmission of its articles of association, a corporation subject to supervision under this chapter shall file with the Department of Public Service a copy of such articles, and a copy of its certificate of paid up capital stock if any.
The corporation shall also, immediately after its organization, forward to the Department of Public Service a copy of the report of its organization containing the names and addresses of the directors and other officials of the corporation.
At the time of commencing, a business, a municipality, person, or company, other than a corporation which is subject to supervision under this chapter, shall file with the Department of Public Service a written statement giving the location, nature, and extent of such business, together with the post office address of the owner or owners, business manager, and other officials.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.

§ 205.
Duty to furnish copies of contracts.

At the request of the Department of Public Service, a corporation subject to supervision under this chapter shall submit to the Department for its approval certified copies of contracts entered into after July 1, 1961, between such corporation and any person, partnership, association, trust, or corporation holding, controlling, or owning 10 percent or more of the voting capital stock of such corporation subject to supervision, or with any other corporation which is itself owned or controlled by a person, partnership, association, trust, or corporation so holding, controlling, or owning 10 percent or more of the voting capital stock of such corporation subject to supervision.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 183

, § 3;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.

§ 206.
Information to be furnished Department.

On request by the Department of Public Service, a company owning or operating a plant, line, or property subject to supervision under this chapter shall furnish the Department information required by it concerning the condition, operation, management, expense of maintenance and operation, cost of production, rates charged for service or for product, contracts, obligations, and the financial standing of such company. It shall also inform the Department of the salaries of, the pensions, option, or benefit programs affecting, and the expenses reimbursed to, its officers or directors, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 183

, § 4;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

2015, No. 29

, § 22.

§ 207.
Report of accidents; investigation.

The superintendent or manager of any line or plant, subject to supervision under this chapter, shall, immediately after its occurrence, notify the Department in writing of any accident that occurs within this State upon such line or plant that results in loss of life or injury to any person that incapacitates him or her from engaging in his or her usual vocations. If the accident is subject to investigation by VOSHA pursuant to 21 V.S.A. chapter 3, subchapters 4 and 5, the Department shall provide support as requested by VOSHA, and VOSHA shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide the Department with any information pertaining to the investigation that is requested by the Department. If the accident is not subject to investigation by VOSHA, the Department shall inquire into the cause of the accident and shall make any recommendations to the company and to the Public Utility Commission as appropriate.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

2021, No. 54

, § 1.

§ 208.
Complaints; investigations; procedure.

A complaint to the Public Utility Commission may be made against a company subject to supervision under the provisions of this chapter concerning any claimed unlawful act or neglect adversely affecting the complainant, who may be a company or five or more individuals or, if less than five are so affected, then any one of them.
The complainant may bring his or her complaint directly before the Commission or he or she may file his or her complaint with the Department of Public Service which shall investigate such complaint and if sufficient cause exists, shall prosecute the same in the name of the State.
Upon request of the trustees of an incorporated village or the selectboard or city council or upon its own motion, the Department of Public Service may institute investigations regarding the price, toll, rate, or rental charged by any utility.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.

§ 208a.
Selection of telecommunications carrier.

No provider of telecommunications services shall submit a change order for primary interexchange carrier or for local exchange carrier to any telecommunications company regarding a Vermont customer unless and until the submitting carrier has obtained express authorization from the customer for the change. Upon request of the customer, offers to provide telecommunications services shall be sent to the customer in written form describing the terms and conditions of service. As used in this section, “express authorization” means an express, affirmative act by the customer clearly agreeing to the change in primary interexchange carrier or local exchange carrier, in the form of:

a written authorization;

a customer initiated call to the submitting carrier;

an oral authorization verified by an independent third party and the verification has been recorded;

electronic authorization; or

some other form of recorded authorization.

A petition alleging violation of this section may be brought to the Public Utility Commission by the customer, by the Department of Public Service, by the Attorney General, or by the customer’s former carrier. If the Public Utility Commission determines after opportunity for hearing that a telecommunications carrier has submitted a change order and cannot demonstrate that it has complied with this section, and with rules adopted by the Commission, the Commission may:
(b) (1) A petition alleging violation of this section may be brought to the Public Utility Commission by the customer, by the Department of Public Service, by the Attorney General, or by the customer’s former carrier. If the Public Utility Commission determines after opportunity for hearing that a telecommunications carrier has submitted a change order and cannot demonstrate that it has complied with this section, and with rules adopted by the Commission, the Commission may:

void any pending charges and require the submitting carrier to pay to the customer an amount equal to all charges previously paid by the customer to the submitting carrier and made possible by the change order, providing that the voiding and repayment shall apply only for a reasonable time after the customer discovered or should have discovered the change in carriers;

require the submitting carrier to pay to the customer an amount of money to compensate for damages that arose because the change order altered the nature or quality of the customer’s telecommunications services;

require the submitting carrier to pay to the former carrier an amount equal to the revenues the former carrier would have received for providing equivalent services to the customer had the unauthorized switch not occurred;

require the submitting carrier to pay to the customer’s local exchange carrier an amount to compensate for any costs arising from changes caused by the invalid change order;

require the submitting carrier to pay, to the petitioner, the costs of prosecuting the complaint before the Commission, including reasonable attorney’s fees, witness fees, and incidental costs; and

require the submitting carrier to pay a penalty as authorized by section 30 of this title.

Payments and penalties under this section shall be in addition to those otherwise provided by law.

The Public Utility Commission shall adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. Such rules shall be no less stringent than the federal rules relating to changes of carrier, and shall include such further provisions as are needed to implement the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 22, 1996; amended

1997, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 208b.
Unauthorized billing.

A company subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission shall not send a bill to a consumer for goods or services that the company provides and that will appear as a charge on the consumer’s telecommunications bill without the consumer’s consent. The Department shall develop a consumer education plan to ensure that consumers of telecommunications services have adequate notice of this requirement. A company that violates this section shall be subject to the remedies authorized by this title, including penalties authorized by section 30 and injunctions authorized by section 209.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.